Utah statutes.
59-10-536.   Assessment and collection of tax -- Change on federal income
tax return -- Taxpayer requirement to make certain filings with the
commission.
(1) (a)  If, before the expiration of the time prescribed in this section for
the assessment of a tax, the commission and the taxpayer agree in writing to
the assessment of the tax in a time period after the time period prescribed in
this section for the assessment of a tax, the tax may be assessed at any time
before the expiration of the period to which the commission and the taxpayer
agree.
(b)  A time period that the commission and a taxpayer agree upon under
Subsection (1)(a) may be extended by written agreement:
(i)  between the commission and the taxpayer; and
(ii)  made before the expiration of the time period that the commission and
the taxpayer previously agreed upon.
(2) (a) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(a)(iii), if a change is made
in a taxpayer's net income on the taxpayer's federal income tax return because
of an action by the federal government, the taxpayer shall file with the
commission within 90 days after the date there is a final determination of the
action:
(A)  a copy of the taxpayer's amended federal income tax return; and
(B)  an amended state income tax return that conforms with the changes made in
the taxpayer's amended federal income tax return.
(ii)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(a)(iii), if a change is made in a
taxpayer's net income on the taxpayer's federal income tax return because the
taxpayer files an amended federal income tax return, the taxpayer shall file
with the commission within 90 days after the date the taxpayer files the
amended federal income tax return:
(A)  a copy of the taxpayer's amended federal income tax return; and
(B)  an amended state income tax return that conforms with the changes made in
the taxpayer's amended federal income tax return.
(iii)  A taxpayer is not required to file a return described in Subsection
(2)(a)(i) or (ii) if a change in the taxpayer's federal income tax return does
not increase state tax liability.
(b) (i)  Subject to Subsection (2)(b)(iii), the commission may assess a
deficiency in state income taxes within three years after a notification or
amended federal income tax return described in Subsection (2)(a) is filed.
(ii)  The amount of an assessment of tax under this Subsection (2)(b) may not
exceed the amount of the increase in Utah tax attributable to the change
described in Subsection (2)(a).
(iii)  If a taxpayer fails to report to the commission a change specified in
this Subsection (2)(b), the assessment may be made at any time within six
years after the date of the change.
(3)  If a deficiency in federal income tax required to be reported is
attributable to a net operating loss carry back or carry forward, a deficiency
in the tax imposed by this chapter may be assessed within three years from the
due date of the return for the taxable year of the net operating loss.
(4)  Except as provided in Subsections (1) through (3), this section does not
affect the time within which or the amount for which an assessment may
otherwise be made.
(5) (a)  An erroneous refund shall be considered an underpayment of tax on the
date the commission makes the erroneous refund.
(b)  An assessment of a deficiency arising out of an erroneous refund may be
made at any time within three years from the date the refund is made, except
that an assessment may be made within five years from the time the refund is
made if any part of the refund is induced by fraud or misrepresentation of a
material fact.
(6) (a)  Subject to Subsection (6)(b), if a return is required for a decedent
or for the decedent's estate during the period of administration, the tax
shall be assessed within 18 months after written request for the assessment:
(i)  made after the return is filed; and
(ii)  by:
(A)  the personal representative; or
(B)  another person representing the estate of the decedent.
(b)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the assessment described in
Subsection (6)(a) may not be made more than three years after the time the
return is filed.
(7) (a)  The amount of a tax imposed by this chapter may be assessed at any
time within six years after the time the return is filed if:
(i)  a resident individual, resident estate, or resident trust omits from
gross income as reported for federal income tax purposes an amount properly
includable in adjusted gross income, which is in excess of 25% of the amount
of gross income stated in the return; or
(ii)  a nonresident individual, nonresident estate, or nonresident trust omits
from gross income as reported for federal income tax purposes an amount of
adjusted gross income derived from Utah sources as defined by Section
59-10-117, properly includable in adjusted gross income, which is in excess of
25% of the amount of adjusted gross income derived from Utah sources which is
reflected in the return.
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (7)(a)(ii), there may not be taken into
account any amount that is omitted in the return if the amount is disclosed:
(i) (A)  in the return; or
(B)  in a statement attached to the return; and
(ii)  in a manner adequate to apprise the commission of the nature and amount
of the item.
